en: White hams, white ham, cooked hams, cooked ham
ca: Pernil dolç, pernil cuit
de: Kochschinken
es: jamón cocido, jamón York
fi: kypsennetyt kinkut
fr: Jambons blancs, Jambon blanc, jambon cuit, jambons cuits, Jambons de Paris, Jambon de Paris
hr: Bijele šunke
hu: Fehér sonka
it: Prosciutti cotti, prosciutto cotto
nl: Gekookte ham
pt: Presuntos brancos
zh: 白火腿

en: Pork ham intended to be cooked, Pork ham intended to be roasted, Pork ham intended to be baked
fr: Jambon de porc à cuire

en: Pork ham with parsley and jelly
fr: Jambon persillé, Jambon persillé en gelée

en: Cooked ham of superior quality
fr: Jambon cuit supérieur, Jambon supérieur

en: Smoked cooked ham of superior quality
fr: Jambons cuits supérieurs fumés, Jambon cuit supérieur fumé, Jambon supérieur fumé

en: Cooked ham with rind of superior quality
fr: Jambon cuit supérieur avec couenne

en: Rind-less cooked ham of superior quality
fr: Jambon cuit supérieur découenné

en: Rind-less and fatless cooked ham of superior quality
fr: Jambon cuit supérieur découenné dégraissé

en: Cooked ham superior quality reduced salt
fr: Jambon cuit supérieur à teneur réduite en sel

en: Cooked ham choice
fr: Jambon de choix cuit

en: Cooked ham choice with rind, Cooked ham choice w rind
fr: Jambon cuit choix avec couenne

en: French hams
bg: Френска шунка
de: Französischer Schinken
fr: Jambons français
hr: Francuske šunke
it: Prosciutto francese

en: British hams
fr: Jambons britanniques
hr: Britanske šunke
pt: Presuntos britânicos

en: Italian hams
bg: Италианска шунка
fr: Jambons italiens
hr: Talijanske šunke
it: Prosciutti italiani

en: Dalmatian hams, Dalmatian prosciutto
hr: Dalmatinski pršut
ko: 달마치야 햄
sh: Dalmatinski pršut
sr: Далматински пршут

en: Spanish hams
bg: Испанска шунка
fr: Jambons espagnols
hr: Španjolske šunke

en: Game hams
fr: Jambons de gibier

en: Cured hams, cured ham
de: Unbehandelte Schinken
es: jamón de país, jamón salado
fr: Jambons crus, jambon cru
hr: Suhomesnate šunke
it: Prosciutti crudi
nl: Rauwe ham
pt: Presuntos curados

en: Dried hams, Dry-cured hams
ca: Pernil assecat, Pernil curat
da: Tørret skinke
de: Getrockene Schinken
es: Jamones secos
fi: kuivatut kinkut
fr: Jambons secs, jambon sec
hr: Sušene šunke
hu: Szárított sonkák
it: Prosciutti secci, prosciutto secco
nl: Gedroogde hammen, Gedroogde ham
pt: Presuntos secos

en: Bayonne ham
es: Jamón de Bayona
fr: Jambons de Bayonne, jambon de bayonne
hr: Bajon šunka
it: Prosciutto di Bayonne
nl: Ham uit Bayonne